Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.180

Security freeze—Changes to information—Written confirmation required.

If a security freeze is in place, a consumer reporting agency may not change any of the following official information in a consumer credit report without sending a written confirmation of the change to the consumer within thirty days of the change being posted to the consumer's file: Name, date of birth, social security number, and address. Written confirmation is not required for technical modifications of a consumer's official information, including name and street abbreviations, complete spellings, or transposition of numbers or letters. In the case of an address change, the written confirmation shall be sent to both the new address and to the former address.

[ 2005 c 342 s 2.]